District of Columbia statutes.
7-2801

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to regulate the sale, lease, rental, installation, service, repair, maintenance, and use of security or fire alarm systems and components thereof, and to license security or fire alarm dealers and agents within the boundaries of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-107, § 2, 27 DCR 3760
Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-99, § 2(c), 35 DCR 1051
1981 Ed., § 6-3101.